Hawaii statutes.
§576B-302 Proceeding by minor parent.
A minor parent, or a guardian or other legal representative of a minor parent,
may maintain a proceeding on behalf of or for the benefit of the minor's child.
[L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next